Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2803
County board of corrections; meetings; functions; dissolution; procedure.

A county board which, by a majority vote of its members, elects to serve as the county board of corrections shall meet as the county board of corrections within sixty days after such election and shall meet at least once every sixty days thereafter. Such board of corrections shall hear arguments and make recommendations for the maintenance, supervision, control, and direction of the county jail and correctional facilities.

A county board which, by a majority vote of its members, elects to serve as the county board of corrections may elect to dissolve the county board of corrections by a majority vote of its members. Such election to dissolve the county board of corrections shall be made at least sixty days before the beginning of the fiscal year in which the sheriff would resume responsibility for the jail.

Laws 1974, LB 782, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 396, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 4.